Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.300 RCW to read as follows:(1) By January 1, 2027, the director shall develop or contract with an external entity for the development of up to one-hour of online or in-person training for tattoo artists on how to recognize the signs of human trafficking, how to respond to those signs, how to refer a client to resources for victims of human trafficking, and how to report signs of human trafficking to an antitrafficking organization in the state. The director shall make the training developed under this subsection available to the public at no cost and in an accessible format.(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, each tattoo artist shall annually complete the training developed under subsection (1) of this section as a requirement for the issuance or reissuance of a license under this chapter.--- END ---